Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE A. DRAINAGE DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 6614. OLD RIVER DRAINAGE DISTRICT OF LIBERTY COUNTY, TEXAS, NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 6614.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Old River Drainage District of Liberty County, Texas, No. 1.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6614.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6614.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT. The conversion of the district into a conservation and reclamation district under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, and the provision to the district of the powers conferred by that section will benefit the residents of and property in the district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6614.004. GOVERNING LAW. The general laws applicable to conservation and reclamation districts govern the district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS

Sec. 6614.051. GENERAL POWERS. The district has the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, to a conservation and reclamation district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2017.